Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2143
Violations, enumerated; penalties; section, how construed.

(1) It shall be a Class IV felony to knowingly and willfully commit or order, instruct, or direct another to commit any of the following acts:

(a) To make a false statement in any license application, request for inspection, certificate, or other lawfully authorized or required form or statement provided by the State Electrical Act;

(b) To perform electrical work for another without a proper license for such work while claiming to have such license;

(c) To fail to file a request for inspection when required;

(d) To interfere with or refuse entry to an inspector lawfully engaged in the performance of his or her duties; or

(e) To fail or neglect to comply with the act or any lawful rule, regulation, or order of the board.

(2) Subdivision (1)(b) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit a person from performing electrical work for such person's parent, stepparent, spouse, descendant, grandparent, brother, sister, cousin, uncle, or aunt, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption or marriage without a license.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 43;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 292;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 81-5,113;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 33;

Laws 2026, LB889, § 2.
July 18, 2026